Utah statutes.
58-16a-601.   Scope of practice.
(1)  An optometrist may:
(a)  provide any optometric services not specifically prohibited under this
chapter or division rules and that are within the optometrist's training,
skills, and scope of competence; and
(b)  prescribe or administer any pharmaceutical agent for the eye and its
adnexa, including all oral pharmaceutical agents, except that:
(i)  the oral antibiotics may only be prescribed for:
(A)  eyelid-related ocular conditions or diseases; and
(B)  any other ocular disease or condition as specified by division rule; and
(ii)  Schedule III controlled substances may only be prescribed or
administered to be taken orally or topically for pain of the eye or adnexa in
a quantity not to exceed 72 hours in duration and which may not be refilled.
(2)  An optometrist may not:
(a)  perform surgery, including laser surgery; or
(b)  prescribe or administer any Schedule II controlled substance as defined
in Title 58, Chapter 37, Controlled Substances.
(3)  An optometrist is a health care provider for purposes of Sections
31A-22-617 and 31A-22-618.
